Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.130

Educator retooling conditional scholarship program.

(1) The educator retooling conditional scholarship program is created. The purpose of the program is to increase the number of public school teachers with endorsements in shortage areas.

(2) To qualify for the program an applicant must:

(a) Hold a current Washington teacher certificate or an expired Washington teacher certificate issued after 2005;

(b) Pursue an additional endorsement in a shortage area; and

(c) Use one of the Washington professional educator standards board's pathways to complete the additional endorsement requirements in the equivalent of one full-time academic year.

(3) Participants are eligible to receive an educator retooling conditional scholarship for up to two academic years.

[ 2019 c 295 s 219; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 9 s 1; 2015 1st sp.s. c 3 s 3; 2007 c 396 s 7. Formerly RCW 28A.660.045.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.

Captions not law—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.305.215.

Finding—Intent—2007 c 396: See note following RCW 28A.188.020.